Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5781YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2075 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.275A Mini-trucks. 1 1. A person shall not operate a mini-truck on a highway 2 with a speed limit greater than fifty-five miles per hour. 3 However, this subsection does not prohibit a person operating a 4 mini-truck from crossing a highway with a speed limit greater 5 than fifty-five miles per hour at an intersection. 6 2. Notwithstanding section 321.115, subsection 1, paragraph 7 âaâ , a mini-truck shall not be registered as an antique vehicle. 8 3. For purposes of this section, âmini-truckâ means a 9 motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained primarily for the 10 transportation of property and having four wheels, an engine 11 displacement of six hundred sixty cubic centimeters or less, an 12 overall length of one hundred thirty inches or less, an overall 13 height of seventy-eight inches or less, and an overall width 14 of sixty inches or less. 15